District of Columbia statutes.
34-1125

Copy of rate schedule to be available for public inspection.

A copy of so much of said schedules as the Commission shall deem necessary for the use of the public shall be printed in plain type and kept on file in every station and office of such public utility where payments are made by the consumers or users, open to the public, in such form and place as to be readily accessible to the public and so as to be conveniently inspected.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 981, ch. 150, § 8, par. 26
1973 Ed., § 43-325.
1981 Ed., § 43-525.
This section is referenced in § 34-1126.